Washington statutes.
RCW 41.07.010

Definitions.

(1) As used in this chapter "state agency" means all offices, departments, agencies, institutions, boards, and commissions of state government including those headed by an elected official and including institutions of higher education.

(2) As used in this chapter "central personnel-payroll system" means an automated data processing system capable of keeping records and processing necessary transactions in the process of employing persons, changing their employment status, and paying employees of any or all state agencies. Such system shall include production of reports and documents required or authorized by state or federal agencies.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 239 s 1.]